Tennessee, session 114, HB0014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-213, is amended by deleting
the semicolon at the end of subdivision (a)(1) and substituting:
. "Abortion" does not include:
(A) The use of contraceptives, including any device, medication, biological
product, or procedure that is generally intended for use in the prevention of pregnancy,
whether specifically intended to prevent pregnancy or for other health needs; or
(B) The disposal of unimplanted embryos resulting from fertility treatments,
including healthcare services, procedures, testing, medications, treatments, or products;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0014
000202
- 1 -